Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-506
Act; how construed.

The Nebraska Redevelopment Act shall be construed in accordance with the authority granted by Article VIII, section 12, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 1995, LB 830, § 6.